da: Begrænsningsport-form: Cirkulær; Ottekantet; Firkant; Squircle; Skiftbar multi-form; Andet
zh-CN: 限制器门形状: 圆形; 八角形; 方形; 圆角方形; 可切换多形状; 其他
en: Restrictor gate shape: Circular; Octagonal; Square; Squircle; Switchable multi-shape; Other
pt-PT: Formato do portão limitador: Circular; Octogonal; Quadrado; Quadrado arredondado; Multiformas comutável; Outro
nb: Restriktorportform: Sirkulær; Oktagonal; Firkantet; Avrundt firkant; Utskiftbar flerform; Annet
el: Σχήμα πύλης περιοριστή: Κυκλική; Οκταγωνικός; Τετράγωνο; Squircle; Εναλλάξιμο πολλαπλών σχημάτων; Άλλο
ja: リストリクターゲート形状: 円形; 八角形; スクエア; 角丸正方形; 切り替え可能マルチシェイプ; その他
hr-HR: Oblik restrikcijskih vrata: Kružna; Osmerokutni; Kvadratna; Zaobljeni kvadrat; Promjenjivi višeoblik; Ostalo
tr: Kısıtlayıcı kapı şekli: Dairesel; Sekizgen şeklinde; Kare; Yuvarlatılmış kare; Değiştirilebilir çoklu şekil; Diğer
pl: Kształt bramki ogranicznika: Tarczowe; Ośmiokątny; Kwadratowy; Kwadrat z zaokrągleniami; Przełączany wielokształtny; Inne
fi: Rajoitinportin muoto: Pyöreä; Kahdeksankulmainen; Neliömäinen; Pyöristetty neliö; Vaihdettava monimuoto; Muu
vi: Hình dạng cổng giới hạn: Hình tròn; Bát giác; Vuông; Vuông bo tròn; Đa hình dạng có thể chuyển đổi; Khác
cs: Tvar omezovací brány: Kruhový; Osmiúhelníkový; Hranaté; Zaoblený čtverec; Přepínatelný vícetvarý; Jiné
sv: Begränsningsgrindform: Cirkulär; Oktagonal; Fyrkantig; Fyrkantigt rundad; Växlingsbar multiform; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма на ограничителната плоча: Кръгла; Осмоъгълна; Квадратен; Закръглен квадрат; Превключваема многоформена; Други
de: Form der Restriktorplatte: Kreisförmig; Achteckig; Quadrat; Squircle; Umschaltbare Mehrfachform; Sonstiges
ru: Форма ограничительной рамки: Круговая; Восьмиугольный; Квадрат; Сквиркл; Переключаемый многоформенный; Другой
ro-RO: Formă clapetă de restricție: Circular; Octogonală; Pătrată; Pătrat rotunjit; Formă multiplă comutabilă; Altele
zh-TW: 限制器門形狀: 圓圈; 八角形; 方頭; 圓角方形; 可切換多形狀; 其他
es: Forma de compuerta restrictora: Circular; Octagonal; Cuadrado; Cuadrado redondeado; Multiforma intercambiable; Otros
lt-LT: Ribotuvo vartų forma: Apvalus; Aštuonkampis; Kvadratinė; Apvalus kvadratas; Perjungiamos kelių formų; Kita
hu: Korlátozó kapu alakja: Cirkuláris; Nyolcszögű; Négyzet; Lekerekített négyzet; Kapcsolható többalakú; Egyéb
th: รูปทรงเกตจำกัด: แบบวงกลม; แบบแปดเหลี่ยม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; สี่เหลี่ยมมน; หลายรูปร่างปรับเปลี่ยนได้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Tvar obmedzovacej brány: Kruhový; Osemhranný; Hranatý; Zaoblený štvorec; Prepínateľný viacúčelový tvar; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika omejevalnih vrat: Krožna; Osemkotna; Kvadrat; Zaobljen kvadrat; Preklopna večoblična; Drugo
pt-BR: Formato da placa restritora: Circular; Octogonal; Quadrado; Quadrado arredondado; Multi-formato intercambiável; Outro
fr: Forme de la plaque de restriction: Circulaire; Octogonal; Carré; Carré arrondi; Multi-forme commutable; Autre
nl: Beperkingspoort vorm: Rond; Achthoekig; Vierkant; Squircle; Schakelbare meervoudige vorm; Andere
ko: 제한 게이트 모양: 원형; 팔각형의; 스퀘어; 스쿼클; 전환식 다형; 기타
it: Forma del gate restrittore: Circolare; Ottagonale; Quadrato; Squircle; Multi-forma commutabile; Altro